Utah statutes.
31A-3-401.   Retaliation against insurers of foreign state or country.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 31A-3-402, when, under the laws of another state or foreign country any taxes, licenses, other fees, deposit requirements, or other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions are or would be imposed on Utah insurers, or on the agents or representatives of Utah insurers, that are in excess of the taxes, licenses, other fees, deposit requirements, or other obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions directly imposed upon similar insurers, or upon the agents or representatives of those insurers, of that other state or country under the statutes of this state, as long as the laws of that other state or country continue in force or are so applied, the same taxes, licenses, other fees, deposit requirements, or other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions of any kind shall be imposed, collected, and enforced by the State Tax Commission, with the assistance of the commissioner, upon the insurers, or upon the agents or representatives of those insurers, of that other state or country doing business or seeking to do business in this state.

(2)  Any tax, license, or other obligation imposed by any city, county, or other political subdivision or agency of another state or country on Utah insurers, their agents, or representatives is considered as being imposed by that state or country within the meaning of this section.

(3)  The commissioner may by rule waive the retaliatory requirements for a person that is:

(a)  doing business in this state; or

(b)  seeking to do business in this state.

